Alabama, session 2026rs, SB27.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Page 1

BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
SB27 INTRODUCED
29 Section 1. Sections 41-6-3 and 41-6-4, Code of Alabama
30 1975, are amended to read as follows:
31 "§41-6-3
32 (a) The department shall be under the control of the
33 Board of Trustees of the Department of Archives and History,
34 which shall consist of one member from each congressional
35 district and the additional members selected pursuant to
36 subsection (b)as the districts existed on January 1, 2025,
37 nine at-large members, and the Governor or his or her
38 designee.
39 (b) Two additional at-large members shall be selected
40 and an additional member shall be selected from each U.S.
41 Congressional District. The additional members shall be
42 selected by the board of trustees and their names shall be
43 communicated to the Senate not later than the fifth
44 legislative day of the 2004 Regular Session of the
45 Legislature. Newly selected members shall be confirmed by the
46 Senate in the same manner as vacancies filled pursuant to
47 Section 41-6-4. The board of trustees shall select three of
48 the new members to serve initial terms of two years, three of
49 the new members to serve initial terms of four years, and
50 three of the new members to serve initial terms of six years.
51 All successor members shall serve terms of six years and shall
52 be selected as provided in Section 41-6-4.
53 (b) Each vacancy in an appointed board seat, as the
54 vacancy arises, whether by expiration of term of service or by
55 death, resignation, or removal shall be filled as follows:
56 (1) Seat 1, a resident of Congressional District 1, for
Page 2

(1) Seat 1, a resident of Congressional District 1, for
SB27 INTRODUCED
57 a six-year term commencing January 1, 2027, and every six
58 years thereafter, appointed by the Governor.
59 (2) Seat 2, a resident of Congressional District 2, for
60 a six-year term commencing January 1, 2029, and every six
61 years thereafter, appointed by the Governor.
62 (3) Seat 3, a resident of Congressional District 3, for
63 a six-year term commencing January 1, 2030, and every six
64 years thereafter, appointed by the Governor.
65 (4) Seat 4, a resident of Congressional District 4, for
66 a six-year term commencing January 1, 2026, and every six
67 years thereafter, appointed by the Governor.
68 (5) Seat 5, a resident of Congressional District 5, for
69 a six-year term commencing January 1, 2028, and every six
70 years thereafter, appointed by the Governor.
71 (6) Seat 6, a resident of Congressional District 6, for
72 a six-year term commencing January 1, 2028, and every six
73 years thereafter, appointed by the Governor.
74 (7) Seat 7, a resident of Congressional District 7, for
75 a six-year term commencing January 1, 2025, and every six
76 years thereafter, appointed by the Governor.
77 (8) Seat 8, a resident of the state at-large, for a
78 six-year term commencing January 1, 2025, and every six years
79 thereafter, appointed by the Governor.
80 (9) Seat 9, a resident of the state at-large, for a
81 six-year term commencing January 1, 2028, and every six years
82 thereafter, appointed by the Speaker of the House of
83 Representatives from three nominees provided by the Minority
84 Leader of the House of Representatives.
Page 3

Leader of the House of Representatives.
SB27 INTRODUCED
85 (10) Seat 10, a resident of the state at-large, for a
86 six-year term commencing January 1, 2030, and every six years
87 thereafter, appointed by the Speaker of the House of
88 Representatives.
89 (11) Seat 11, a resident of the state at-large, for a
90 six-year term commencing January 1, 2027, and every six years
91 thereafter, appointed by the Speaker of the House of
92 Representatives.
93 (12) Seat 12, a resident of the state at-large, for a
94 six-year term commencing January 1, 2026, and every six years
95 thereafter, appointed by the Speaker of the House of
96 Representatives.
97 (13) Seat 13, a resident of the state at-large, for a
98 six-year term commencing January 1, 2025, and every six years
99 thereafter, appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
100 Senate.
101 (14) Seat 14, a resident of the state at-large, for a
102 six-year term commencing January 1, 2027, and every six years
103 thereafter, appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
104 Senate.
105 (15) Seat 15, a resident of the state at-large, for a
106 six-year term commencing January 1, 2029, and every six years
107 thereafter, appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
108 Senate from three nominees provided by the Minority Leader of
109 the Senate.
110 (16) Seat 16, a resident of the state at-large, for a
111 six-year term commencing January 1, 2026, and every six years
112 thereafter, appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
Page 4

thereafter, appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
SB27 INTRODUCED
113 Senate.
114 (c) The membership of the board of trustees appointing
115 authorities shall be coordinate their appointments to assure
116 that the membership of the board is inclusive and shall
117 reflect reflects the racial and, gender, geographic, urban,
118 rural, and economic diversity of the state.
119 (d) Each appointed member shall serve at the pleasure
120 of his or her appointing authority."
121 "§41-6-4
122 (a) The board of trustees shall fill all vacancies
123 occurring on the board, whether by expiration of term of
124 service or by death or resignation, but the The names of all
125 successor newly appointed board members shall be communicated
126 to the then current session or the next ensuing regular
127 session of the state Senate for confirmation. If the Senate
128 rejects any successor trusteeappointed member, the board
129 appointing authority shall proceed forthwith to fill the
130 vacancy with a different appointee.
131 (b) A trustee An individual appointed to succeed a
132 member whose term has expired shall serve for a term of six
133 years. A person An individual appointed to fill a vacancy
134 occurring by death or, resignation, or removal shall only
135 serve out the unexpired term of his or her predecessor. A
136 person whose appointment to the board has been confirmed by
137 the Senate shall serve beyond his or her expired term until a
138 successor has been confirmed by the Senate.
139 (c) The board shall hold at the State Capital at least
140 one regular meeting during every year and as many special
Page 5

one regular meeting during every year and as many special
SB27 INTRODUCED
141 meetings as may be necessary, and at any meeting. a A majority
142 of the trustees board members shall constitute a quorum. The
143 Governor of the state, or his or her designee, shall be a
144 voting member of the board as authorized by Section 41-6-3,
145 and he or she shall, as far as possible, shall lend every
146 encouragement to the success and upbuilding development of the
147 department. The director shall be the secretary of the board.
148 The trustees Members of the board shall receive no
149 compensation for their services. Each member of the board of
150 trustees shall be reimbursed at the same per diem and travel
151 allowance amounts paid by law to state employees for each day
152 of attendance of the business of the board.
153 (d) The board may do all of the following:
154 (1) Adopt rules for its own government and also for the
155 government of the department.
156 (2) Elect a director and provide for the selection or
157 appointment of other officials or employees as may be
158 authorized.
159 (3) Provide for the publication of historical material
160 pertaining to the state under the supervision of the director.
161 (4) Control and expend such appropriations as may be
162 made for the maintenance of the department.
163 (5) Perform such other acts as may be necessary to
164 carry out the intent and purposes of this article."
165 Section 2. This act shall be retroactive to January 1,
166 2025.
167 Section 3. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 6